Alabama, session 2026rs, HB577.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. In Class 2 municipalities, in addition to
any other authority for the sale of alcoholic beverages, the
sale of alcoholic beverages for off-premises consumption on
Sunday may commence at 10:00 a.m.
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 1